Utah statutes.
31A-22-317.   Definitions.

As used in Sections 31A-22-316 through 31A-22-319:

(1)  "Aftermarket crash part" means a replacement for any of the nonmechanical sheet metal or plastic parts that generally constitute the exterior of a motor vehicle, including inner and outer panels.

(2)  "Installer" means an individual who replaces or repairs the parts of a motor vehicle.

(3)  "Insurer" means an insurance company and any person authorized to represent the insurer with respect to a claim.

(4)  "Nonoriginal equipment manufacturer" or "non-OEM" means a manufacturer of replacement parts for a different manufacturer's equipment.

(5)  "Non-OEM aftermarket crash part" means an aftermarket crash part not made for or by the manufacturer of the motor vehicle.

(6)  "Repair facility" means any motor vehicle dealer, garage, body shop, or other commercial entity that repairs or replaces those parts that generally constitute the exterior of a motor vehicle.

